Utah statutes.
49-23-104.   Creation of trust fund.
(1)  There is created the "New Public Safety and Firefighter Tier II
Contributory Retirement Trust Fund" for the purpose of paying the benefits and
costs of administering the defined benefit portion of this system.
(2)  The fund shall consist of all money paid into it, including interest, in
accordance with this chapter, whether in the form of cash, securities, or
other assets, and of all money received from any other source.
(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by
Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.
